Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 418.978 is amended to read:
418.978. (1) A commission known as the System of Care Advisory Council is established.
(2) The council consists of [ 25] 29 members appointed as follows:
(a) The Chief Justice of the Supreme  Court shall appoint one representative from the Judicial
Department.
(b) The Governor shall appoint:
(A) Two members who are representatives of  the Department of Human Services with extensive
knowledge of systems  of care, one of whom must have direct experience with intellectual and de-
velopmental disabilities programs.
(B) One member who is a representative of the  Oregon Youth Authority with extensive know-
ledge of systems of care.
(C) One member who is a representative of the Oregon Health Authority  with extensive know-
ledge of systems of care.
(D) One member who is a representative of the Department of Education.
(E) Two members  who are representatives of coordinated care organizations meeting the criteria
adopted by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.572, at least one of which  must provide
services to rural communities.
(F) One psychiatrist, one psychologist and one pediatric physician, each of whom must  have
clinical experience with youth.
(G) One member who is a representative of an entity that offers commercial insurance.
(H) Three members who are representatives  of agencies that provide different services and
supports to youth and families of youth.
(I) One member who is a representative of organizations that advocate for youth.
(J) One member who is a representative of organizations that advocate for families of youth.
(K) [ Two] Four  members of the public, each of whom are family members of:
(i) Persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities or mental illness; or
(ii) Persons  who are currently or were previously in the foster care system or the youth criminal
justice system.
(L) [ Two] Four  members of the public who are no more than 25 years of age at the time of ap-
pointment or reappointment and who:
(i) Are persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities or mental illness; or
Enrolled House Bill 2924 (HB 2924-INTRO) Page 1
(ii) Are currently or were previously [ a ward, youth or adjudicated youth, as those terms are de-
fined in ORS 419A.004 ] involved with the child welfare or juvenile justice system .
(M) One member who is a county juvenile department director.
(N) One member who is a county mental health program director.
(O) One member who is a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe in this  state or a
designee of the Indian tribe.
(P) One member who is a representative of Oregon’s federally mandated disability protection and
advocacy agency.
(3) The term of office of each member of  the council is four years, but a member serves at the
pleasure of the appointing authority. Before the expiration of the term of a member,  a successor
shall be appointed whose term begins  on January 2 next following. A member is eligible for reap-
pointment to one additional term. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall
make an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(4)(a) Members of the council who are not  state employees are not entitled to compensation or
reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the council.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, members  of the council described in sub-
section (2)(b)(K) and (L) of this section may be  reimbursed for travel and other reasonable expenses
associated with serving on the council.
(5) Members of the council who are state employees carrying out their state  employment func-
tions are entitled to compensation and reimbursement by their employing  agencies for actual and
necessary travel and  other expenses incurred by them in the performance of their official duties as
members of the council.
(6) The  Governor shall appoint one of the members as chairperson, to serve at the pleasure of
the Governor. The members of the council shall elect from among themselves a vice chairperson
who shall preside over  meetings and exercise the functions of the chairperson during the absence
or disability of the chairperson. The chairperson and the vice chairperson shall execute the  duties
determined by the council to be necessary.
(7) The council shall appoint an executive director who shall be in the exempt  service and who
shall be responsible for the performance of duties assigned by the  council. Subject to the State
Personnel Relations Law, the executive director may employ appropriate staff to carry out the  du-
ties assigned by the council.
(8) The council shall meet at least four  times per year at a place, day and hour determined by
the council.
(9) A majority of the  members of the council constitutes a quorum for the transaction of busi-
ness.
Enrolled House Bill 2924 (HB 2924-INTRO) Page 2
Passed by House April 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 7, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2924 (HB 2924-INTRO) Page 3